Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.525

Disability leave supplement for law enforcement officers and firefighters—Continuation of employee insurance benefits.

The disability leave supplement provided in RCW 41.04.510(3) shall not be considered salary or wages for personal services: PROVIDED, That the employee shall also continue to receive all insurance benefits provided in whole or in part by the employer, notwithstanding the fact that some portion of the cost of those benefits is paid by the employee: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the portion of the cost not paid by the employer continues to be paid by the employee.

[ 1989 c 11 s 10; 1985 c 462 s 7.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 11: See note following RCW 9A.56.220.

Program and fiscal review—1985 c 462: See note following RCW 41.04.500.